Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-244
Lost deed or instrument; how proved.

The copy of any record, or of any recorded deed or instrument, attested and authenticated in such manner as would by law entitle it to be read in evidence, may, on proof of the loss of the original and of the record, be again recorded, and such record shall have the same effect as the original record.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 24, p. 285;

R.S.1913, § 6219;

C.S.1922, § 5618;

C.S.1929, § 76-224;

R.S.1943, § 76-244.